Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB807.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of the act of December 22, 1983 (P.L.306, No.84), known as the Board of Vehicles Act, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Independent motor vehicle dealer." A used vehicle dealer under this act. The term does not include a new vehicle dealer, new manufactured housing dealer, used manufactured housing or mobile home dealer, new recreational vehicle dealer, used 1234567891011121314151617181920 recreational vehicle dealer or mobility vehicle dealer.* * *Section 2. Section 321 of the act is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 321. Application for license.* * *(a.2) Independent motor vehicle dealer education requirements.--An applicant for an initial license as an independent motor vehicle dealer or renewal license by an existing independent motor vehicle dealer shall complete a web-based or in-person education and training course under subsection (a.5)(3) prior to, and as a condition for, renewal licensure under this chapter. If an independent motor vehicle applicant is a business entity, the web-based or in-person training and education course shall be completed by the sole proprietor, owner or operating partner of a partnership, corporation, limited liability company or other business entity.(a.3) Independent motor vehicle dealer pre-licensing exemption.--Subsection (a.2) shall not apply to:(1) An independent motor vehicle dealer if the individual or business entity has been licensed for 10 years or more.(2) An applicant for an initial license as an independent motor vehicle dealer if the applicant is already licensed under this chapter as a new vehicle dealer.(a.4) Development of education and training course.--The board shall develop a web-based or in-person education and training course for education and training course providers to submit to the board for approval within 180 days of the effective date of this subsection. The course shall include 20250HB0807PN0835 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 information on the laws and board rules and regulations applicable to an independent motor vehicle dealer and the consequences of violating those laws and regulations.(a.5) Independent motor vehicle dealer education and training course providers.--(1) An independent motor vehicle dealer education and training course provider shall be approved by the board.(2) All independent motor vehicle dealer education and training courses shall be approved by the board.(3) A course shall consist of at least 20 hours of web-based or in-person instruction for applicants seeking initial licensure as an independent motor vehicle dealer and shall consist of two hours of web-based or in-person instruction for licensees seeking renewal.(4) The cost of the initial education and training course shall not exceed $300 per person, and the cost of the independent motor vehicle dealer renewal course shall not exceed $75 per person unless approved by the board.(5) The education and training course provider shall issue a certificate of completion to each individual who successfully completes the course.(a.6) Renewal education and training penalty.--Notwithstanding subsection (a.3), the board may require an independent motor vehicle dealer to undergo and complete additional educational and training courses under this section if the independent motor vehicle dealer is found to be in violation of this chapter.(a.7) Regulations.--The board shall promulgate regulations as necessary to implement this section no later than 180 days from the effective date of this subsection.20250HB0807PN0835 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 3. All regulations and parts of regulations are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with the provisions of this act.Section 4. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The addition of section 321(a.2) of the act shall take effect one year after the promulgation of regulations under section 321(a.7).(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0807PN0835 - 4 - 12345678910